Washington statutes.
RCW 18.79.090

Commission—Compensation.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

Each *commission member shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.265 and shall be paid travel expenses when away from home in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

[1999 c 366 s 5; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 409.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The reference to "nursing care quality assurance commission" was changed to "board of nursing" by 2023 c 123.